North Carolina, session 2025, HB309.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. RURAL DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITIES
HERTFORD COUNTY RURAL DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY
SECTION 1.1. Section 23 of Chapter 988 of the 1965 Session Laws, as amended by
Chapter 931 of the 1969 Session Laws and S.L. 2023-143, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 23. This Act shall only apply to the counties of Cherokee, Clay, Graham, Hertford,
Jackson, Macon, Swain, Transylvania, and Yancey."
TRANSYLVANIA RURAL DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY
SECTION 1.2.(a) Establishment. – There is established a separate and independent
body corporate and politic to be known as the Transylvania Rural Development Authority. The
Transylvania Rural Development Authority shall have all the powers and duties granted to a rural
development authority established under Chapter 988 of the 1965 Session Laws, as amended by
Chapter 931 of the 1969 Session Laws and S.L. 2023-143. The board of commissioners of
Transylvania County shall have no authority over the Transylvania Rural Development
Authority.
SECTION 1.2.(b) Membership; Organization; Removal. – (a) There shall be nine
members of the Authority who shall be appointed by the Transylvania Economic Alliance. Each
member shall be a resident of Transylvania County and shall serve a term of five years. In order
to stagger the members' terms, the appointing authority shall, in appointing the initial members,
appoint one member to serve a term of two years, one member to serve a term of three years, and
one member to serve a term of five years. A member shall hold office until the member's
successor is appointed and qualified. Vacancies for unexpired terms shall be promptly filled by
the appointing authority, and the person appointed shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired
term. A member shall receive no compensation for the member's services but shall, within the
limit of available funds, be entitled to reimbursement of necessary expenses, including travel
expenses, incurred in the discharge of duties.
(b) The members of the Authority shall select from among their membership a
person to serve as chair, vice-chair, and any other officers they deem necessary to conduct the
business of the Authority. The Authority shall adopt rules and regulations consistent with the
provisions of Chapter 988 of the 1965 Session Laws, as amended, as necessary for the proper
discharge of its duties. The chair may appoint committees that are authorized by the Authority's
rules and regulations. The Authority shall meet regularly at the times and places specified in its
rules and regulations, and special meetings may be called pursuant to those rules. All meetings
shall be open to the public. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for all purposes.
(c) A member of the Authority may only be removed by the appointing authority
for inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office. No member shall be removed unless
*H309-v-5*

the member has been given a copy of the charges at least 10 days prior to the hearing and has
been given an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel.
SECTION 1.2.(c) Staff; Employees. – Within the limits of available funds, the
Authority shall appoint the Transylvania Economic Alliance to operate the Authority. The
Authority may delegate to one or more of its members, agents, or employees the powers and
duties which it deems necessary to carry out its powers and duties, subject always to the
supervision and control of the Authority.
SECTION 1.2.(d) Interest of Members or Employees. – No member or employee of
the Authority shall (i) acquire any interest, direct or indirect, in any development project or any
property included, or planned to be included, in any development project, or in any area which
the member or employee may have reason to believe may be included in any development project
or (ii) have any interest, direct or indirect, in any contract or proposed contract for materials or
services to be furnished or used by the Authority or in connection with any development project.
The acquisition of any interest in a development project or in any property or contract as
described in this section shall constitute misconduct in office. If any member or employee of the
Authority shall have already owned or controlled within the preceding two years any interest,
direct or indirect, in any property later included or planned to be included in any development
project under the jurisdiction of the Authority, or has any interest in any contract for material or
services to be furnished or used in connection with any development project, the member or
employee shall disclose the interest in writing to the Authority, and the disclosure shall be entered
upon the minutes of the Authority. Failure to make a disclosure required by this section shall
constitute misconduct in office.
SECTION 1.2.(e) Certificate of Incorporation. – The Authority shall file a copy of
this act with the Secretary of State and, upon receipt of the act, the Secretary of State shall issue
a certificate of incorporation. In any suit, action, or proceeding involving or relating to the
validity or enforcement of any contract or act of the Authority, a copy of the certificate of
incorporation duly certified by the Secretary of State shall be admissible in evidence and shall be
conclusive proof of the legal establishment of the Authority.
SECTION 1.2.(f) Environmental Issues. – Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, neither Transylvania County or any other county, the State of North Carolina, or any other
governmental unit that provides funds to the Authority for a development project or other project
shall be liable for any environmental issues, known or unknown, related to the project solely
because of providing funds.
SECTION 1.2.(g) This section applies only to Transylvania County.
PART II. VARIOUS MUNICIPAL MODIFICATIONS
TOWN OF BOILING SPRINGS CHARTER
SECTION 2.1.(a) The Charter of the Town of Boiling Springs is revised and
consolidated to read:
"THE CHARTER OF THE TOWN OF BOILING SPRINGS.
"ARTICLE I. INCORPORATION AND CORPORATE POWERS.
"Section 1.1. Incorporation. The Town of Boiling Springs, in Cleveland County, North
Carolina, and the inhabitants thereof, shall continue to be a municipal body politic and corporate,
under the name of the "Town of Boiling Springs," hereinafter referred to as the "Town."
"Section 1.2. Powers. The Town shall continue to be vested with all of the property and
rights in property belonging to the Town; shall have perpetual succession; may sue and be sued;
may contract and be contracted with; may acquire and hold any property, real and personal,
devised, bequeathed, sold, or in any manner conveyed, dedicated to, or otherwise acquired by it;
and, from time to time, may hold, invest, sell, or dispose of the same, may have a common seal,
and alter and renew the same at will. The enumeration of any particular powers, rights,
Page 2 Session Law 2025-32 House Bill 309

immunities, or authorities shall not be held or deemed to be exclusive. In addition to any powers,
rights, or authorities enumerated or implied under this Charter, the Town shall have and may
exercise all the powers, functions, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities of every kind and
nature whatsoever conferred upon the Town now or in the future under the general laws of the
State of North Carolina, local acts applicable to the Town, and this Charter.
"ARTICLE II. CORPORATE BOUNDARIES.
"Section 2.1. Corporate Boundaries. The corporate limits of the Town shall be those existing
at the time of ratification of this Charter, as the same are set forth on an official map of the Town,
and as such limits may be altered from time to time in accordance with law. An official map of
the Town, showing the current municipal boundaries, shall be maintained permanently in the
office of the Town Clerk and shall be available for public inspection. Upon alteration of the limits
pursuant to law, the appropriate changes to the official map of the Town shall be made and copies
shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, the Cleveland County Register of Deeds, and
the Cleveland County Board of Elections.
"ARTICLE III. GOVERNING BODY.
"Section 3.1. Governing Body. The Town Council (hereinafter "Council") and the Mayor
shall be the governing body of the Town. When the context of this Charter requires it, "the Town"
shall mean the governing body of the Town.
"Section 3.2. Composition of Town Council. The Council shall consist of five members,
each to be elected at large by the qualified voters of the Town in the manner provided in Article
IV of this Charter.
"Section 3.3. Mayor. The Mayor shall be elected by the qualified voters of the Town voting
at large in the manner provided in Article IV of this Charter. The Mayor shall be the official head
of the Town government and shall preside at all meetings of the Council. The Mayor shall vote
only in the case of a tie.
"Section 3.4. Mayor Pro Tempore. In accordance with general law, the Council shall elect
one of its members to act as Mayor Pro Tempore to perform the duties of the Mayor during the
Mayor's absence.
"Section 3.5. Terms and Vacancies. Members of the Council shall serve staggered four-year
terms with three members elected in the same election every four years and two members and
the Mayor elected in the same election two years thereafter. The Mayor shall serve a four-year
term. Vacancies that occur in any elective office of the Town shall be filled in accordance with
G.S. 160A-63.
"Section 3.6. Meetings. In accordance with general law, the Council shall establish a suitable
time and place for its regular meetings. Special and emergency meetings may be held as provided
by general law. Official actions of the Council and all votes shall be taken in accordance with the
applicable provisions of general law.
"ARTICLE IV. ELECTIONS.
"Section 4.1. Regular Municipal Elections. Regular municipal elections shall be held in each
odd-numbered year in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws of North Carolina.
The election of members of the Council and the Mayor shall be conducted on a nonpartisan basis,
and the results determined using the nonpartisan plurality method as provided by G.S. 163-292.
"ARTICLE V. ORGANIZATION AND ADMINISTRATION.
"Section 5.1. Form of Government. The Town shall operate under the council-manager form
of government in accordance with Part 2 of Article 7 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes.
"Section 5.2. Town Manager. The Council shall appoint a Town Manager to serve at its
pleasure who shall be the chief administrative official of Town government, and who shall be
responsible to the Council for the proper administration of the affairs of the Town. The Town
Manager shall have those powers and duties provided by general law. In addition, the Town
Manager shall appoint the Town Clerk, Finance Officer, Tax Collector, and Chief of Police and
House Bill 309 Session Law 2025-32 Page 3

may create new positions or departments or assign additional functions to offices, positions, or
departments as provided by general law.
"Section 5.3. Town Attorney. The Council shall appoint a Town Attorney who shall represent
the Town, advise Town officials, and perform other duties required by law or as the Council may
direct."
SECTION 2.1.(b) The purpose of this section is to revise the Charter of the Town
of Boiling Springs and to consolidate certain acts concerning the property, affairs, and
government of the Town. It is intended to continue without interruption those provisions of prior
acts that are expressly consolidated into this section and those provisions of prior acts which are
not inconsistent with the foregoing so that all rights and liabilities which have accrued are
preserved and may be enforced.
SECTION 2.1.(c) This section does not repeal or affect any acts concerning the
property, affairs, or government of public schools or any acts validating official actions,
proceedings, contracts, or obligations of any kind.
SECTION 2.1.(d) The following acts, having served the purposes for which they
were enacted or having been consolidated into this section, are expressly repealed:
(1) Chapter 279 of the Private Laws of 1911.
(2) Chapter 273 of the Private Laws of 1913.
(3) Chapter 1188 of the 1951 Session Laws.
(4) Chapter 668 of the 1957 Session Laws.
SECTION 2.1.(e) This section does not affect any rights or interests that arose under
any provisions repealed by this section.
SECTION 2.1.(f) All existing ordinances, resolutions, and other provisions of the
Town of Boiling Springs not inconsistent with the provisions of this section shall continue in
effect until repealed or amended.
SECTION 2.1.(g) Whenever a reference is made in this section to a particular
provision of the General Statutes and such provision is later amended, superseded, or recodified,
the reference shall be deemed amended to refer to the amended General Statute or to the General
Statute that most clearly corresponds to the statutory provision that is superseded or recodified.
SECTION 2.1.(h) If any provision of this section or application thereof is held
invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this section that can be
given effect without the invalid provision or application and, to this end, the provisions of this
section are declared to be severable.
MILLS RIVER UNIFIED DEVELOPMENT ORDINANCE
SECTION 2.3.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 160D-601, as amended by Section 3K.1(a)
of S.L. 2024-57, the Town of Mills River may adopt the unified development ordinance initiated
by the Town Council in October 2024.
SECTION 2.3.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law, and any adoption
of the unified development ordinance shall occur on or before July 1, 2026.
TOWN OF MOORESVILLE PROPERTY CONVEYANCES
SECTION 2.4. The Charter of Mooresville, being Chapter 239 of the 1975 Session
Laws, is amended by adding a new section to read:
"Sec. 11.4. Conveyance of property. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
Board of Commissioners may, with or without consideration, and upon such terms as it deems
wise, convey real property owned by the Town for one or more of the following purposes: (i)
affordable housing for low- and moderate-income persons, (ii) housing for veterans, and (iii)
housing for emergency responders; provided, however, no real property acquired by the exercise
of eminent domain may be conveyed under this section. The deed conveying the real property
may contain a restriction which provides that the real property shall revert to the Town if it ceases
Page 4 Session Law 2025-32 House Bill 309

to be used for increasing the supply of housing, as authorized in this section, prior to the
expiration of the time period established by the Board of Commissioners. Any conveyance of
real property under this section may be made only pursuant to a resolution adopted by the Board
of Commissioners at a regular or special meeting authorizing a municipal official designated by
the Board of Commissioners in accordance with this Charter or general or local law to make the
conveyance for one or more of the purposes authorized in this section. The resolution shall be
posted on the Town's website at least 10 calendar days prior to the date the conveyance is
executed by the municipal official.
(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) Emergency responder. – A firefighter, law enforcement officer, paramedic,
emergency medical technician, or other individual, including an employee of
a legally organized and recognized volunteer organization, whether
compensated or not, who, in the course of his or her professional duties,
responds to fire, medical, hazardous material, or other similar emergencies.
(2) Veteran. – A person who served as a member of the United States Armed
Forces in active duty, as defined by 38 U.S.C. § 101, and who was either
separated from the United States Armed Forces under honorable conditions or
who is currently serving in a second or subsequent enlistment. The term also
means a person who was separated from the United States Armed Forces
under honorable conditions with a disability that was incurred (i) as a direct
result of armed conflict or (ii) while the person was engaged in
extra-hazardous service, including service under conditions simulating war."
CITY OF WILMINGTON PROPERTY CONVEYANCES
SECTION 2.5. Section 13.8 of the Charter of the City of Wilmington, as amended
by Chapter 615 of the 1991 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 13.8. Conditions and Restrictions on the Sale of Property. (a) The City of
Wilmington may make any sale, exchange, or transfer of property pursuant to G.S. 160A-268,
160A-269, 160A-270, or 160A-271 in any manner authorized by general or local law, subject to
such covenants, conditions, and restrictions as the City Council may deem to be in the public
interest.
(b) Conveyance of real property with restrictions. The City Council may, in addition to
other authorized means, approve the sale, exchange, or transfer of the fee or any lesser interest
in real property, either by public sale or by negotiated private sale. The transfer shall be in
furtherance of adopted City policies or plans for the area. The City may attach to the transfer and
to the interest conveyed any covenants, conditions, or restrictions, or a combination of them, the
City deems necessary to further the adopted policies or plans. The consideration received by the
City for the conveyance may reflect the restricted use of the property resulting from the
covenants, conditions, or restrictions. The City may invite bids or written proposals, including
detailed development plans and site plans, for the purchase of any such property or property
interest, whether by sale, exchange, or other transfer, pursuant to the specifications as may be
approved by the City. A sale, exchange, or other transfer of real property, or interest therein,
pursuant to this section may be made contingent upon any necessary rezoning of the property.
Any conveyance under this section may be made only pursuant to a resolution of the City Council
authorizing the conveyance. Notice by publication of the proposed transaction shall be given at
least 10 days prior to adoption of the resolution, and the notice shall generally describe (i) the
property involved, (ii) the nature of the interest to be conveyed, and (iii) all of the material terms
of the proposed transaction, including any covenants, conditions, or restrictions which may be
applicable. The notice shall give the time and place of the City Council meeting where the
proposed transaction will be considered and shall announce the Council's intention to authorize
House Bill 309 Session Law 2025-32 Page 5

the proposed transaction. The authority contained in this section is in addition to, and not in
limitation of, any other authority granted by this Charter or any other general or local law."
PART III. VARIOUS COUNTY MODIFICATIONS
TEMPORARILY MODIFY DISTRIBUTION AND USE OF LOCAL SALES AND USE
TAX ALLOCATED TO BUNCOMBE COUNTY AND MAKE TECHNICAL CHANGES
TO BUNCOMBE SCHOOL CAPITAL FUND COMMISSION
SECTION 3.1.(a) Notwithstanding Section 6 of Chapter 134 of the 1983 Session
Laws, as amended by Chapter 534 of the 1983 Session Laws and S.L. 2016-19, directing that
one-half of the local government sales and use tax revenue be distributed to the School Capital
Fund Commission for Buncombe County (Commission), the Secretary of Revenue shall
distribute one hundred percent (100%) of the net proceeds of the local government sales and use
tax revenue collected by Buncombe County under Article 39 of Chapter 105 of the General
Statutes in accordance with G.S. 105-472 using the ad valorem method of distribution.
Notwithstanding the provision in G.S. 105-472 allowing counties to change the method of
distribution, Buncombe County is not permitted to change the method of distribution for any year
for which the distribution and use provisions of this section apply.
SECTION 3.1.(b) Notwithstanding the use provisions in Sections 9 through 12 of
Chapter 134 of the 1983 Session Laws, as amended by Chapter 534 of the 1983 Session Laws
and S.L. 2016-19, and applicable to the funds distributed to the Commission, Buncombe County
shall use the net proceeds of the local government sales and use tax revenue collected under
Article 39 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes and allocated to Buncombe County under
subsection (a) of this section as follows:
(1) Fifty percent (50%) for local school administrative unit capital outlay
purposes, as defined in G.S. 115C-426(f), or to retire any indebtedness
incurred by the County for these purposes, and for local school administrative
unit operating expenses. Prior to any funds allocated under this subdivision
being used for local school administrative unit operating expenses, the
Buncombe County Board of Commissioners must provide the Buncombe
County Board of Education and the Asheville City Board of Education the
opportunity to present at a public meeting the impacts of not using those funds
on school capital projects. The Commission shall serve in an advisory capacity
to the Buncombe County Board of County Commissioners with respect to the
use of funds under this subdivision for school capital outlay purposes by
considering the capital needs of both the Buncombe County School System
and the Asheville City School System, prioritizing those needs, and
recommending projects to be funded. However, the use of funds under this
subdivision shall not be under the control of the Commission and shall be
determined by the Board of Commissioners.
(2) Fifty percent (50%) for any public purpose.
SECTION 3.1.(c) To the extent Buncombe County receives any federal or State
disaster funding as revenue replacement, the county shall return a proportionate share of revenue
replacement funds to the Commission up to the amount of diverted funds under this section. The
proportionate share shall be equal to the amount of revenue replacement received divided by the
County's total revenue loss multiplied by the amount of diverted funds. Any remaining funds
shall be used for any purposes allowed by the granting entity. For purposes of this subsection,
the following definitions apply:
(1) Revenue replacement. – Grant monies to compensate for tax or fee revenue
lost as the result of the impacts of Hurricane Helene to the extent the monies
are unrestricted in use and available for any public purpose.
Page 6 Session Law 2025-32 House Bill 309

(2) Total revenue loss. – Tax and fee revenue projected in the county budget for
FY 2024-2025 that was not realized due to the impacts of Hurricane Helene.
(3) Diverted funds. – The total amount of funds distributed by the Secretary of
Revenue to Buncombe County under subsection (a) of this section and used
for local school administrative unit operating expenses in accordance with
subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 3.1.(d) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to net
proceeds distributed to Buncombe County by the Secretary of Revenue under Article 39 of
Chapter 105 of the General Statutes on or after July 1, 2025, and expires on June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3.2.(a) Chapter 134 of the 1983 Session Laws, as amended by Chapter
534 of the 1983 Session Laws and S.L. 2016-19, is rewritten and recodified as subsections (b)
through (m) of this section.
SECTION 3.2.(b) There is hereby created a Commission to be known as the School
Capital Fund Commission for Buncombe County, which Commission shall have and possess all
the powers conferred by this section and such other powers as may be useful or necessary to
permit it fully to carry out the purposes of this section. The Commission is hereby declared to be
a corporation with perpetual succession, the right to adopt and use a corporate seal, to sue and to
be sued, and to hold, manage, and control the moneys and properties received by it under the
provisions of this section. It shall have the right to make reasonable rules and regulations for the
conduct of its business.
SECTION 3.2.(c) The Commission shall consist of five members. Members of the
Commission shall serve two-year terms and shall be appointed as follows: one appointed by the
Asheville City Board of Education, one appointed by the Buncombe County Board of Education,
two appointed by the Buncombe County Board of Commissioners, and one appointed by the
other four appointees. A member appointed by a local governing board or a school board shall
serve at the pleasure of that board. The member appointed by the other appointees shall serve at
the pleasure of the majority of the other appointees. Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing
authority of the member creating the vacancy to fill the unexpired term.
SECTION 3.2.(d) A quorum shall be three members of the Commission.
SECTION 3.2.(e) The Commission shall organize, adopt bylaws or rules and
regulations to govern its procedure and the conduct of the business and affairs of the Commission,
and appoint a chairman and vice-chairman from among its membership who shall serve a
one-year term and appoint a secretary for a one-year term and until their successors are appointed
by the Commission. The finance officer for Buncombe County shall be the finance officer of the
Commission. The county finance officer shall give bond for the faithful performance of his duties
as the finance officer of the Commission in an amount determined by the Commission. The
finance officer of the Commission shall manage the funds of the Commission only as directed
by the Commission. The Commission may select and appoint an attorney of the Commission to
serve at the pleasure of the Commission. The Commission may fix the compensation for the
attorney.
SECTION 3.2.(f) Regular or stated meetings of the Commission shall be held at
such time and place as may be provided by the Commission in its bylaws or rules and regulations,
and special meetings may be held on the call of the chairman after due notice.
SECTION 3.2.(g) One-half of any local government sales and use tax revenue
distributed to Buncombe County under G.S. 105-472 shall be paid to the Commission by the
Secretary of Revenue; provided that if distribution of the local government sales and use tax
revenue is made under G.S. 105-472(2), (the ad valorem method), then taxing districts shall
receive their funds under G.S. 105-472(2) as if no funds had been paid to the Commission by the
Secretary of Revenue, and in computing what amount is one-half of the sales and use tax revenue,
the Secretary of Revenue shall not reduce the total by the amount to be distributed to the taxing
House Bill 309 Session Law 2025-32 Page 7

districts. This section does not affect the distribution of any local or State sales and use tax
revenue to the municipalities in Buncombe County.
SECTION 3.2.(h) Any other capital funds appropriated by Buncombe County
pursuant to Article 40 and Article 42 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes shall be apportioned
among the Asheville City Board of Education and the Buncombe County Board of Education
according to the membership of each unit using the process set forth in G.S. 115C-430.
Buncombe County shall maintain separate internal accounts for each school board in order to
comply with this section. These funds are not under the control of the School Capital Fund
Commission.
SECTION 3.2.(i) All funds received by the Commission under subsection (g) of this
section shall be placed in a capital reserve fund as provided in Part 2 of Article 3 of Chapter 159
of the General Statutes. The capital reserve fund shall be known as the Public School Capital
Needs Fund.
SECTION 3.2.(j) All funds in the Public School Capital Needs Fund shall be used
to finance new public school construction, to finance public school improvement and renovation
projects that exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or to retire any indebtedness
incurred by the county for these purposes.
The Commission shall consider the capital needs of both the Buncombe County
School System and the Asheville City School System, prioritize those needs, and recommend
projects to be funded from the Public School Capital Needs Fund to the board of county
commissioners based on the priority of needs determined.
By joint agreement of the board of county commissioners and both boards of
education, money may be transferred from the account under this section of one board of
education to the account under this section of the other board of education, provided that the
agreement must require a transfer back of an equal amount of funds at some fixed date in the
future, plus a sum to be determined at that date which represents interest which would have
accrued on the funds if they had remained in the first account.
SECTION 3.2.(k) Moneys in the Public School Capital Needs Fund shall be subject
to appropriation by the board of county commissioners. The Commission shall disburse such
moneys as a ministerial duty upon receiving a written request from the board of county
commissioners after the county board of commissioners has adopted an ordinance and after
receipt of a written request from the appropriate board of education indicating it is prepared to
enter into a contract, and G.S. 115C-521 shall continue to apply.
SECTION 3.2.(l) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if the
Buncombe County Board of Commissioners appropriates any federal revenue sharing funds to
the Commission for the purpose of substituting revenue sharing funds for sales tax funds, then it
must at the same time appropriate from the Commission to the county an equal amount of funds
received under subsection (g) of this section to be used for such purposes as the Board of
Commissioners shall deem appropriate and are otherwise authorized by law, provided that such
federal revenue sharing funds shall be divided pro rata under subsection (j) of this section.
SECTION 3.2.(m) The reasonable and necessary expenses of the Commission,
including the compensation of its officers and employees and the cost of any bond required by
it, shall be paid by the County of Buncombe. The chairman of the Commission shall, on or about
the first day of each calendar month, certify to the governing body of Buncombe County the
expenses of the Commission incurred during the preceding month, and the governing body of the
county shall forthwith, and within five days thereafter, cause to be paid to the Commission the
expenses required to be paid. All such payments shall be charged to the general fund of the
county.
ALLOW MITCHELL AND YANCEY COUNTIES TO SIGN MEMORANDUMS OF
UNDERSTANDING WITH UNICOI COUNTY
Page 8 Session Law 2025-32 House Bill 309

SECTION 3.3.(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Mitchell
County Sheriff's Office and the Yancey County Sheriff's Office may enter into memorandums of
understanding with the Unicoi County, Tennessee, Sheriff's Office to engage across state lines in
law enforcement special operations missions and cooperative law enforcement actions.
SECTION 3.3.(b) Any memorandum of understanding entered into pursuant to this
section shall specify the manner in which liability claims for damage to persons or property as a
result of law enforcement special operations missions and cooperative law enforcement actions
will be shared or assigned. While ensuring public safety, each memorandum of understanding
shall limit to the greatest extent possible the liability of Mitchell County, Yancey County, and
the State.
SECTION 3.3.(c) No later than November 1 of each year, any memorandum of
understanding entered into that year pursuant to this section shall be reported to the Department
of Justice.
ALLOW ONSLOW COUNTY TO DELEGATE REZONING AUTHORITY
SECTION 3.5.(a) G.S. 160D-602 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-602. Notice of hearing on proposed zoning map amendments.
…
(f) Delegation. – The governing board may, by ordinance, delegate to the planning board
the authority to conduct the hearing required under this Article and make the final decision on
zoning map amendment proposals, including the adoption of a consistency statement pursuant to
this Article. The governing board may prescribe procedures for the hearing that are not
inconsistent with this Article. The planning board shall make its final decision by majority vote
of the members of the planning board. Any person with standing may appeal a decision of the
planning board made pursuant to this subsection to the governing board by providing written
notice to the clerk to the governing board within 15 days of the final decision. On appeal, the
governing board shall review the decision of the planning board de novo. If no notice of appeal
of the planning board decision is provided within 15 days of the final decision, then the decision
of the planning board shall be final and equivalent to the final decision of the governing board.
The governing board may, by ordinance, rescind or modify any authority delegated to the
planning board pursuant to this subsection."
SECTION 3.5.(b) This section applies only to Onslow County.
PART IV. BOARDS OF EDUCATION – PARTISAN ELECTIONS
COLUMBUS COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION
SECTION 4.1.(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-35, the Columbus County Board of
Education shall consist of five members elected to serve staggered four-year terms. Five members
shall be elected from residency districts. One member shall be elected from each residency
district by the qualified voters of the entire county, excluding the area encompassing the
Whiteville City School Administrative Unit. No person shall be eligible to file for or be elected
to the Columbus County Board of Education unless the person is a qualified voter and resident
of the residency district in which the person seeks to be elected.
SECTION 4.1.(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-37, members of the Columbus
County Board of Education shall be elected on a partisan basis at the time of the general election
in each even-numbered year as terms expire. Candidates for election to the Columbus County
Board of Education shall be nominated at the same time and in the same manner as other county
officers. Members shall take office on the first Monday in December following their election.
Members shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified.
House Bill 309 Session Law 2025-32 Page 9

SECTION 4.1.(c) All vacancies in the membership of the Columbus County Board
of Education by death, resignation, or other causes shall be filled in accordance with
G.S. 115C-37.1.
SECTION 4.1.(d) This section does not affect the terms of office of any person
elected in 2024 to the Columbus County Board of Education. Any vacancy on the Columbus
County Board of Education for a member elected in 2024 shall be filled by appointment by the
remaining members of the Columbus County Board of Education to serve the remainder of the
unexpired term. Each member of the Columbus County Board of Education elected in 2024, or
any member appointed to fill a vacancy for a member elected in 2024, shall serve until a successor
has been elected and qualified.
SECTION 4.1.(e) All laws and clauses of laws in conflict with this section are hereby
repealed, including the following:
(1) Chapter 717 of the 1953 Session Laws.
(2) Section 1 of Chapter 114 of the 1961 Session Laws.
(3) Chapter 327 of the 1961 Session Laws.
(4) Chapter 754 of the 1961 Session Laws.
(5) Chapter 295 of the 1963 Session Laws.
(6) Section 1 of Chapter 1053 of the 1969 Session Laws.
(7) Section 3 of Chapter 192 of the 1981 Session Laws.
(8) Section 2 of Chapter 234 of the 1983 Session Laws.
GASTON COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION
SECTION 4.2.(a) Section 2 of Chapter 633 of the 1977 Session Laws reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 2. Composition of board of education.
(a) Notwithstanding Section 115-18 of the General Statutes of North Carolina,
G.S. 115C-35, the board of education shall consist of nine members. members elected to
staggered four-year terms. Two members shall be elected by the duly qualified voters of Gaston
County without regard to residence in any particular township and seven from the county at-large
and seven members shall be elected by the duly qualified voters of Gaston County from the
following townships:from residency districts. For the seven residency district seats, no person
shall be eligible to file for or be elected to the board of education unless the person is a qualified
voter and resident of the residency district in which the candidate seeks to be elected. All
members of the board of education shall be elected by the qualified voters of Gaston County.
(b) The residency districts for the board of education and the number of members from
each residency district are as follows:
(1) Cherryville Township shall be entitled to one member.
(2) Crowders Mountain Township shall be entitled to one member.
(3) Dallas Township shall be entitled to one member.
(4) Gastonia Township shall be entitled to two members.
(5) Riverbend Township shall be entitled to one member.
(6) Southpoint Township shall be entitled to one member."
SECTION 4.2.(b) Section 3 of Chapter 633 of the 1977 Session Laws reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 3. Elections. Notwithstanding Section 115-19 of the General Statutes of North Carolina,
at the general election to be held in the year 1978, there shall be elected by the duly qualified
voters of Gaston County three members of the board of education, with one member from
Cherryville Township, one member from Crowders Mountain Township and one member at
large. The term for these three members shall commence on the first Monday in December 1978,
and expire at the end of two years thereafter, or on the first Monday in December 1980.
Page 10 Session Law 2025-32 House Bill 309

At the general election to be held in the year 1980, there shall be elected by the duly qualified
voters of Gaston County six members of the board of education, with one member from
Cherryville Township, one member from Crowders Mountain Township, one member from
Gastonia Township, one member from Riverbend Township, one member from Southpoint
Township and one member at large. Those members elected from Cherryville Township,
Crowders Mountain Township, Gastonia Township and the member elected at large shall
compose one class, whose term of office shall commence on the first Monday in December 1980,
and expire at the end of four years thereafter, or on the first Monday in December 1984. The term
of office for those members elected from Riverbend Township and Southpoint Township shall
commence on the First Monday in December 1980, and expire at the end of two years thereafter,
or on the first Monday in December 1982.
At the general election to be held in the year 1982, there shall be elected by the duly qualified
voters of Gaston County five members of the board of education, with one member from Dallas
Township, one member from Gastonia Township, one member from Riverbend Township, one
member from Southpoint Township and one member at large. These five members shall compose
another class, whose terms of office shall commence on the first Monday in December 1982, and
expire at the end of four years thereafter, or on the first Monday in December 1986.
Upon the expiration of the term of office of each class of members of the board of education
(the term class shall exclude the members elected for a term of two years) their successors shall
be elected to hold office for four years and until their successors are elected and
qualified.Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-37, members of the board of education shall be elected on
a partisan basis at the time of the general election in each even-numbered year as terms expire.
Candidates for election to the board of education shall be nominated at the same time and in the
same manner as other county officers. Members shall take office on the first Monday in
December following their election. Members shall serve until their successors are elected and
qualified.
The election of members of the board of education shall be held, conducted and supervised
by the board of elections; and except as herein provided, the general election laws and regulations
for the nomination and election of county officers, which are set forth in Chapter Chapters 115C
and 163 of the General Statutes of North Carolina, as amended, Carolina shall apply and govern
as to the holding of any election for members of the board of education."
SECTION 4.2.(c) Section 4 of Chapter 633 of the 1977 Session Laws, as amended
by Chapter 331 of the 1979 Session Laws and Chapter 73 of the 1993 Session Laws, is repealed.
SECTION 4.2.(d) Section 7 of Chapter 633 of the 1977 Session Laws reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 7. Vacancy. Notwithstanding Section 115-24 of the General Statutes of North Carolina,
all All vacancies in the membership of the board of education by death, resignation, or other
causes shall be filled by the remaining members of the board of education by the appointment of
a person to serve until the next election of members of such board at which time the remaining
unexpired term of the office in which the vacancy occurs shall be filled by election. In the event
that the replacement is not selected by the board of education within a period of 90 days after the
vacancy occurs, such vacancy shall be filled by the board of commissioners. When one who has
been elected at large vacates his office, the successor may be selected without regard to the
location of his residence in the county. When one who has been elected from a township vacates
his office, the successor shall be selected from that same township.in accordance with
G.S. 115C-37.1."
SECTION 4.2.(e) This section does not affect the term of any member elected in
2024 to the Gaston County Board of Education. Any vacancy on the Gaston County Board of
Education for a member elected in 2024 shall be filled by appointment by the remaining members
of the Gaston County Board of Education to serve the remainder of the unexpired term. Each
member of the Gaston County Board of Education elected in 2024, or any member appointed to
House Bill 309 Session Law 2025-32 Page 11

fill a vacancy for a member elected in 2024, shall serve until a successor has been elected and
qualified.
SCOTLAND COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION
SECTION 4.3.(a) Subsection (a) of Section 4 of Chapter 707 of the 1963 Session
Laws, as amended by Chapter 306 of the 1973 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 4.(a) The Scotland County Board of Education shall be comprised of 8 members.
members elected to serve staggered four-year terms. Five of the members shall be residents of
the Stewartsville Township and 3 of the members shall be residents of any of the remaining 3
townships in Scotland County at large. No person shall be eligible to file for or be elected to the
Scotland County Board of Education unless the person is a qualified voter and resident of the
residency district in which the candidate seeks to be elected. All members of the Scotland County
Board of Education shall be elected by the qualified voters of Scotland County."
SECTION 4.3.(b) Subsection (g) of Section 4 of Chapter 707 of the 1963 Session
Laws, as amended by Chapter 306 of the 1973 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"(g) All candidates for membership on the Scotland County Board of Education shall file
a notice of such candidacy with the Board of Elections not later than 12:00 p.m. on the Monday
preceding the tenth Tuesday before the primary election is to be held and each candidate shall
pay a filing fee of ten dollars ($10.00) and in addition shall certify in writing whether he or she
is filing for the Stewartsville Township seat or the at-large seat, the township within which he
resides and that he is a bona fide resident thereof, said notice to be filed with the Scotland County
Board of Elections.seat."
SECTION 4.3.(c) Section 4 of Chapter 707 of the 1963 Session Laws, as amended
by Chapter 306 of the 1973 Session Laws, is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(k) Notwithstanding G.S. 115C-37, members of the Scotland County Board of Education
shall be elected on a partisan basis at the time of the general election in each even-numbered year
as terms expire. Candidates for election to the Scotland County Board of Education shall be
nominated at the same time and in the same manner as other county officers. Members shall take
office on the first Monday in December following the election. Members shall serve until their
successors are elected and qualified. All vacancies in the membership of the Scotland County
Board of Education by death, resignation, or other causes shall be filled in accordance with
G.S. 115C-37.1."
SECTION 4.3.(d) Subsections (b) through (f) and (h) through (j) of Section 4 of
Chapter 707 of the 1963 Session Laws, as amended by Chapter 306 of the 1973 Session Laws,
are repealed.
SECTION 4.3.(e) This section does not affect the terms of office of any person
elected in 2024 to the Scotland County Board of Education. Any vacancy on the Scotland County
Board of Education for a member elected in 2024 shall be filled by appointment by the remaining
members of the Scotland County Board of Education to serve the remainder of the unexpired
term. Each member of the Scotland County Board of Education elected in 2024, or any member
appointed to fill a vacancy for a member elected in 2024, shall serve until a successor has been
elected and qualified.
JOHNSTON COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION
SECTION 4.4.(a) Section 1 of S.L. 1997-32 reads as rewritten:
"Section 1. Beginning with the 1998 election, the The Johnston County Board of Education
shall be elected in nonpartisan partisan elections held in even-numbered years as provided in this
act. Members shall be nominated at the same time and manner as other county officers."
SECTION 4.4.(b) Section 3 of S.L. 1997-32, as amended by S.L. 2023-147, is
repealed.
Page 12 Session Law 2025-32 House Bill 309

SECTION 4.4.(c) Section 4 of S.L. 1997-32, as amended by S.L. 2023-143, reads
as rewritten:
"Section 4. If a vacancy occurs on the Johnston County Board of Education, the remaining
members of the Johnston County Board of Education shall appoint a person to fill that seat. The
person appointed to fill the vacancy shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term of the office.
vacancy shall be filled in accordance with G.S. 115C-37.1. Any person appointed to fill a
vacancy shall be a resident of the single-member residency district in which the vacancy occurs."
SECTION 4.4.(d) This section does not affect the terms of office of any person
elected in 2024 to the Johnston County Board of Education. Any vacancy on the Johnston County
Board of Education for a member elected in 2024 shall be filled by appointment of the remaining
members of the Johnston County Board of Education to serve the remainder of the unexpired
term. Each member of the Johnston County Board of Education elected in 2024, or any member
appointed to fill a vacancy for a member elected in 2024, shall serve until a successor has been
elected and qualified.
SECTION 4.5. G.S. 115C-37.1(d), as amended by S.L. 2025-3, reads as rewritten:
"(d) This section shall apply only to the Asheboro City Board of Education, the Hickory
City Board of Education and the Newton-Conover City Board of Education and in the following
counties: Alexander, Alleghany, Ashe, Beaufort, Brunswick, Burke, Cabarrus, Caldwell,
Carteret, Catawba, Cherokee, Clay, Columbus, Craven, Dare, Davie, Forsyth, Gaston, Graham,
Harnett, Henderson, Hyde, Iredell, Johnston, Lee, Lincoln, Madison, McDowell, Mitchell, New
Hanover, Onslow, Pamlico, Pender, Polk, Rowan, Rutherford, Scotland, Stanly, Stokes, Surry,
Vance, Washington, and Yancey."
PART V. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 30th day of June, 2025.
s/ Phil Berger
President Pro Tempore of the Senate
s/ Donna McDowell White
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
House Bill 309 Session Law 2025-32 Page 13